Illinois, session 104th, SB1389.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Adult Protective Services Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 and by adding Section 2.5 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 20/2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6602)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context requires otherwise:9    (a) "Abandonment" means the desertion or willful forsaking 10of an eligible adult by an individual responsible for the care 11and custody of that eligible adult under circumstances in 12which a reasonable person would continue to provide care and 13custody. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 14eligible adult is a victim of abandonment because of health 15care services provided or not provided by licensed health care 16professionals. 17    (a-1) "Abuse" means causing any physical, mental or sexual 18injury to an eligible adult, including exploitation of such 19adult's financial resources, and abandonment or subjecting an 20eligible adult to an environment which creates a likelihood of 21harm to the eligible adult's health, physical and emotional 22well-being, or welfare.23    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an   SB1389- 2 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1eligible adult is a victim of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or 2self-neglect for the sole reason that he or she is being 3furnished with or relies upon treatment by spiritual means 4through prayer alone, in accordance with the tenets and 5practices of a recognized church or religious denomination.6    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 7eligible adult is a victim of abuse because of health care 8services provided or not provided by licensed health care 9professionals.10    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to mean that an 11eligible adult is a victim of abuse in cases of criminal 12activity by strangers, telemarketing scams, consumer fraud, 13internet fraud, home repair disputes, complaints against a 14homeowners' association, or complaints between landlords and 15tenants. 16    (a-5) "Abuser" means a person who is a family member, 17caregiver, or another person who has a continuing relationship 18with the eligible adult and abuses, abandons, neglects, or 19financially exploits an eligible adult.20    (a-6) "Adult with disabilities" means a person aged 18 21through 59 who resides in a domestic living situation and 22whose disability as defined in subsection (c-5) impairs his or 23her ability to seek or obtain protection from abuse, 24abandonment, neglect, or exploitation. 25    (a-7) "Broker-dealer" means any person engaged in the 26business of effecting transactions in securities in this State   SB1389- 3 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1for the account of others or for that person's own account and 2who is registered with the United States Securities and 3Exchange Commission. 4    (a-10) (a-7) "Caregiver" means a person who either as a 5result of a family relationship, voluntarily, or in exchange 6for compensation has assumed responsibility for all or a 7portion of the care of an eligible adult who needs assistance 8with activities of daily living or instrumental activities of 9daily living.10    (b) "Department" means the Department on Aging of the 11State of Illinois.12    (c) "Director" means the Director of the Department.13    (c-5) "Disability" means a physical or mental disability, 14including, but not limited to, a developmental disability, an 15intellectual disability, a mental illness as defined under the 16Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code, or dementia 17as defined under the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act. 18    (d) "Domestic living situation" means a residence where 19the eligible adult at the time of the report lives alone or 20with his or her family or a caregiver, or others, or other 21community-based unlicensed facility, but is not:22        (1) A licensed facility as defined in Section 1-113 of 23    the Nursing Home Care Act;24        (1.5) A facility licensed under the ID/DD Community 25    Care Act; 26        (1.6) A facility licensed under the MC/DD Act;   SB1389- 4 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1        (1.7) A facility licensed under the Specialized Mental 2    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013; 3        (2) A "life care facility" as defined in the Life Care 4    Facilities Act;5        (3) A home, institution, or other place operated by 6    the federal government or agency thereof or by the State 7    of Illinois;8        (4) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution, the 9    principal activity or business of which is the diagnosis, 10    care, and treatment of human illness through the 11    maintenance and operation of organized facilities 12    therefor, which is required to be licensed under the 13    Hospital Licensing Act;14        (5) A "community living facility" as defined in the 15    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act;16        (6) (Blank);17        (7) A "community-integrated living arrangement" as 18    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 19    Licensure and Certification Act or a "community 20    residential alternative" as licensed under that Act;21        (8) An assisted living or shared housing establishment 22    as defined in the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act; 23    or 24        (9) A supportive living facility as described in 25    Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 26    (e) "Eligible adult" means either an adult with   SB1389- 5 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1disabilities aged 18 through 59 or a person aged 60 or older 2who resides in a domestic living situation and is, or is 3alleged to be, abused, abandoned, neglected, or financially 4exploited by another individual or who neglects himself or 5herself. "Eligible adult" also includes an adult who resides 6in any of the facilities that are excluded from the definition 7of "domestic living situation" under paragraphs (1) through 8(9) of subsection (d), if either: (i) the alleged abuse, 9abandonment, or neglect occurs outside of the facility and not 10under facility supervision and the alleged abuser is a family 11member, caregiver, or another person who has a continuing 12relationship with the adult; or (ii) the alleged financial 13exploitation is perpetrated by a family member, caregiver, or 14another person who has a continuing relationship with the 15adult, but who is not an employee of the facility where the 16adult resides.17    (f) "Emergency" means a situation in which an eligible 18adult is living in conditions presenting a risk of death or 19physical, mental or sexual injury and the provider agency has 20reason to believe the eligible adult is unable to consent to 21services which would alleviate that risk.22    (f-1) "Financial exploitation" means the use of an 23eligible adult's resources by another to the disadvantage of 24that adult or the profit or advantage of a person other than 25that adult. 26    (f-3) "Investment advisor" means any person required to   SB1389- 6 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1register as an investment adviser or investment adviser 2representative under Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law 3of 1953, which for purposes of this Act excludes any bank, 4trust company, savings bank, or credit union, or their 5respective employees. 6    (f-5) "Mandated reporter" means any of the following 7persons while engaged in carrying out their professional 8duties:9        (1) a professional or professional's delegate while 10    engaged in: (i) social services, (ii) law enforcement, 11    (iii) education, (iv) the care of an eligible adult or 12    eligible adults, or (v) any of the occupations required to 13    be licensed under the Behavior Analyst Licensing Act, the 14    Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, the Clinical Social 15    Work and Social Work Practice Act, the Illinois Dental 16    Practice Act, the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act, the 17    Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, the Medical 18    Practice Act of 1987, the Naprapathic Practice Act, the 19    Nurse Practice Act, the Nursing Home Administrators 20    Licensing and Disciplinary Act, the Illinois Occupational 21    Therapy Practice Act, the Illinois Optometric Practice Act 22    of 1987, the Pharmacy Practice Act, the Illinois Physical 23    Therapy Act, the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, 24    the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the 25    Respiratory Care Practice Act, the Professional Counselor 26    and Clinical Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice   SB1389- 7 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1    Act, the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology 2    Practice Act, the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice 3    Act of 2004, and the Illinois Public Accounting Act;4        (1.5) an employee of an entity providing developmental 5    disabilities services or service coordination funded by 6    the Department of Human Services; 7        (2) an employee of a vocational rehabilitation 8    facility prescribed or supervised by the Department of 9    Human Services;10        (3) an administrator, employee, or person providing 11    services in or through an unlicensed community based 12    facility;13        (4) any religious practitioner who provides treatment 14    by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the 15    tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious 16    denomination, except as to information received in any 17    confession or sacred communication enjoined by the 18    discipline of the religious denomination to be held 19    confidential;20        (5) field personnel of the Department of Healthcare 21    and Family Services, Department of Public Health, and 22    Department of Human Services, and any county or municipal 23    health department;24        (6) personnel of the Department of Human Services, the 25    Guardianship and Advocacy Commission, the State Fire 26    Marshal, local fire departments, the Department on Aging   SB1389- 8 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1    and its subsidiary Area Agencies on Aging and provider 2    agencies, except the State Long Term Care Ombudsman and 3    any of his or her representatives or volunteers where 4    prohibited from making such a report pursuant to 45 CFR 5    1324.11(e)(3)(iv);6        (7) any employee of the State of Illinois not 7    otherwise specified herein who is involved in providing 8    services to eligible adults, including professionals 9    providing medical or rehabilitation services and all other 10    persons having direct contact with eligible adults;11        (8) a person who performs the duties of a coroner or 12    medical examiner;13        (9) a person who performs the duties of a paramedic or 14    an emergency medical technician; or15        (10) a person who performs the duties of an investment 16    advisor; . 17        (11) a person who performs the duties of a 18    broker-advisor; or 19        (12) an officer, manager, or employee of a financial 20    institution. 21    (g) "Neglect" means another individual's failure to 22provide an eligible adult with or willful withholding from an 23eligible adult the necessities of life including, but not 24limited to, food, clothing, shelter or health care. This 25subsection does not create any new affirmative duty to provide 26support to eligible adults. Nothing in this Act shall be   SB1389- 9 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1construed to mean that an eligible adult is a victim of neglect 2because of health care services provided or not provided by 3licensed health care professionals.4    (h) "Provider agency" means any public or nonprofit agency 5in a planning and service area that is selected by the 6Department or appointed by the regional administrative agency 7with prior approval by the Department on Aging to receive and 8assess reports of alleged or suspected abuse, abandonment, 9neglect, or financial exploitation. A provider agency is also 10referenced as a "designated agency" in this Act. 11    (i) "Regional administrative agency" means any public or 12nonprofit agency in a planning and service area that provides 13regional oversight and performs functions as set forth in 14subsection (b) of Section 3 of this Act. The Department shall 15designate an Area Agency on Aging as the regional 16administrative agency or, in the event the Area Agency on 17Aging in that planning and service area is deemed by the 18Department to be unwilling or unable to provide those 19functions, the Department may serve as the regional 20administrative agency or designate another qualified entity to 21serve as the regional administrative agency; any such 22designation shall be subject to terms set forth by the 23Department.24    (i-5) "Self-neglect" means a condition that is the result 25of an eligible adult's inability, due to physical or mental 26impairments, or both, or a diminished capacity, to perform   SB1389- 10 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1essential self-care tasks that substantially threaten his or 2her own health, including: providing essential food, clothing, 3shelter, and health care; and obtaining goods and services 4necessary to maintain physical health, mental health, 5emotional well-being, and general safety. The term includes 6compulsive hoarding, which is characterized by the acquisition 7and retention of large quantities of items and materials that 8produce an extensively cluttered living space, which 9significantly impairs the performance of essential self-care 10tasks or otherwise substantially threatens life or safety. 11    (j) "Substantiated case" means a reported case of alleged 12or suspected abuse, abandonment, neglect, financial 13exploitation, or self-neglect in which a provider agency, 14after assessment, determines that there is reason to believe 15abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation has 16occurred.17    (k) "Verified" means a determination that there is "clear 18and convincing evidence" that the specific injury or harm 19alleged was the result of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or 20financial exploitation. 21(Source: P.A. 102-244, eff. 1-1-22; 102-953, eff. 5-27-22; 22103-329, eff. 1-1-24; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    (320 ILCS 20/2.5 new)24    Sec. 2.5. Financial exploitation.25    (a) As used in this Section, unless the context requires   SB1389- 11 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1otherwise: 2    "Financial institution" means any of the following: 3        (1) A depository institution, as defined in Section 4    3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. 5    1813(c)). 6        (2) An institution-affiliated party, as defined in 7    Section 3(u) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 8    U.S.C. 1813(u)). 9        (3) A federal credit union or state credit union, as 10    defined in Section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 11    U.S.C. 1752), including, but not limited to, an 12    institution-affiliated party of a credit union, as defined 13    in Section 206(r) of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 14    U.S.C. 1786(r)). 15    "Representative" means a person or entity that is either 16of the following:17        (1) A conservator, trustee, or other representative of 18    the estate of an eligible adult.19        (2) An attorney-in-fact of an eligible adult who acts 20    within the authority of the power of attorney. 21    (b) Financial exploitation of an eligible adult occurs 22when a person or entity does any of the following: 23        (1) Takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains 24    real or personal property of an eligible adult for a 25    wrongful use or with intent to defraud, or both. 26        (2) Assists in taking, secreting, appropriating,   SB1389- 12 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1    obtaining, or retaining real or personal property of an 2    eligible adult for a wrongful use or with intent to 3    defraud, or both. 4        (3) Knowingly aids and abets in the taking, secreting, 5    appropriating, obtaining, or retaining of real or personal 6    property of an eligible adult for a wrongful use or with 7    intent to defraud, or both.8        (4) Takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or 9    retains, or assists in taking, secreting, appropriating, 10    obtaining, or retaining, real or personal property of an 11    eligible adult by undue influence. 12    (c) A person or entity is deemed to have taken, secreted, 13appropriated, obtained, or retained property for a wrongful 14use or assisted in taking, secreting, appropriating, 15obtaining, or retaining property for a wrongful use, if, among 16other things, the person or entity takes, secretes, 17appropriates, obtains, or retains the property or assists in 18taking, secreting, appropriating, obtaining, or retaining the 19property and the person or entity knew or should have known 20that this conduct is likely to be harmful to the eligible 21adult. 22    (d) A person or entity takes, secretes, appropriates, 23obtains, or retains real or personal property when an eligible 24adult is deprived of any property right, including by means of 25an agreement, donative transfer, or testamentary bequest, 26regardless of whether the property is held directly or by a   SB1389- 13 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1representative of an eligible adult. 2    (e) Assisting in the financial exploitation of an eligible 3adult occurs when a person or entity does either of the 4following: 5        (1) For a financial institution or an officer, 6    manager, or employee of a financial institution, a 7    broker-dealer, or an investment advisor, executing a 8    transaction with or processing a transaction on behalf of 9    an eligible adult for which both of the following apply: 10            (A) The eligible adult interacts with one or more 11        officers, managers, or employees of the financial 12        institution or with the broker-dealer or investment 13        advisor in the process of requesting, initiating, or 14        completing the transaction. 15            (B) The financial institution or the officer, 16        manager, or employee of the financial institution, the 17        broker-dealer, or the investment advisor fails to act 18        as a reasonable person or entity in a like position 19        would, considering the surrounding facts and 20        circumstances, including the transaction history of 21        the eligible adult, whether the transaction is aligned 22        with prevailing business practices, and whether the 23        eligible adult exhibits multiple red flags, in 24        executing the transaction with or processing the 25        transaction on behalf of the eligible adult. As used 26        in this subparagraph, "red flags" refers to the   SB1389- 14 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1        behavioral and financial red flags enumerated in Elder 2        Financial Exploitation Advisory in FinCEN Advisory 3        FIN-2022-A002 by the United States Department of the 4        Treasury. 5        (2) For any other mandated reporter not listed in 6    paragraph (1), failing to act as a reasonable person in a 7    like position would, considering the surrounding facts and 8    circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the 9    following: 10            (A) The vulnerability of the eligible adult. 11            (B) The extent to which the eligible adult relied 12        on the mandated reporter to handle the eligible 13        adult's finances or for financial advice or financial 14        decisions. 15            (C) Any information the eligible adult provided to 16        the mandated reporter about the situation. 17            (D) The mandated reporter's past interactions with 18        the eligible adult and whether the eligible adult's 19        behavior was markedly different than in the eligible 20        adult's prior interactions with the mandated reporter. 21            (E) Whether the mandated reporter has a fiduciary 22        duty to the eligible adult. 23            (F) Any instructions or information the mandated 24        reporter has been given about the eligible adult's 25        capacity or ability to make decisions. 26            (G) Any trainings the mandated reporter has taken   SB1389- 15 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1        or should have taken, or information the mandated 2        reporter has received or should have received, on the 3        subjects of elder abuse and financial exploitation. 4    (f)(1) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subsection (e), a 5financial institution or an officer, manager, or employee of a 6financial institution, a broker-dealer, or an investment 7advisor shall be deemed to have acted reasonably if the person 8or entity proves that, at the time that the transaction was 9requested, the person or entity gave the eligible adult an 10explanation and warning, verbally and in writing, regarding 11the person's or entity's knowledge of, or suspicion of, 12financial exploitation occurring with respect to that 13transaction, and if either of the following is met:14        (A) If the eligible adult has designated a trusted 15    contact person to receive notification of any known or 16    suspected financial exploitation, or there is a joint 17    holder on the account for which the transaction is 18    requested, the person or entity contacted the trusted 19    contact person or joint account holder and obtained 20    consent for the transaction.21        (B)(i) If the financial institution or an officer, 22    manager, or employee of the financial institution, the 23    broker-dealer, or the investment advisor was unable to 24    communicate with and obtain the consent of a secondary 25    authorized account holder or trusted contact person, or 26    there was no joint account holder or designated trusted   SB1389- 16 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1    contact person, the person or entity refused the 2    transaction, or notified the appropriate provider agency 3    and law enforcement and held the transaction for 15 4    business days or until the provider agency or law 5    enforcement informed the person or entity that the 6    transaction should be completed. If, at any time during 7    the 15-day period, the eligible adult informs the person 8    or entity that the eligible adult does not wish to 9    complete the transaction, the person or entity does not 10    act reasonably if they complete the transaction anyway.11        (ii) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 12    for the purposes of item (i), a financial institution or 13    an officer, manager, or employee of a financial 14    institution, a broker-dealer, or an investment advisor is 15    authorized to delay or refuse a requested transaction if 16    the person or entity notified the provider agency and law 17    enforcement.18    (2) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of subsection (e), a 19nonsupervisory employee of a financial institution may not be 20held personally liable in his or her individual capacity for 21violations of this Section. However, this Section does not 22affect the liability of the financial institution for its own 23acts or under the theory of respondeat superior.24    (g) Nothing in this Section shall in any way affect or 25contravene any other reporting requirements under this Act. 26    (h) Nothing in this Section shall apply to criminal   SB1389- 17 -LRB104 10854 KTG 20936 b1prosecutions of financial exploitation of an elderly person or 2a person with a disability. 3    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent 4or significantly interfere with any financial institution's 5exercise of its powers under federal law. 6    (j) If any provision of this Section or its application to 7any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of 8that provision or application does not affect other provisions 9or applications of this Section that can be given effect 10without the invalid provision or application.